Wisconsin, session 2025, AB700.
do enact as follows:AB700,14Section 1. 20.835 (2) (de) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 5.... (2025 Assembly Bill .... (LRB-5462/1)), is amended to read:AB700,2,2620.835 (2) (de) Long-term care insurance assessment credit. The amounts in 1the schedule A sum sufficient to make the payments under ss. 71.07 (12) (d) 2., 271.28 (12) (d) 2., 71.47 (12) (d) 2., and 76.633 (4).AB700,23Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB700,2,44(1) Reconciliation provision.AB700,2,85(a) If 2025 Assembly Bill .... (LRB-5462/1), or any other 2025 bill whose 6content is identical to the content of 2025 Assembly Bill .... (LRB-5462/1), is enacted 7into law, then this act takes effect on the effective date of the first of those bills that 8is enacted into law or on the effective date of this paragraph, whichever is later.AB700,2,99(b) If par. (a) does not apply, then this act is void.AB700,2,1010